Nebraska, session 109, LB1195.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 47-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-111 (1) This section applies to a county containing a city of the
metropolitan class or a city of the primary class.
(2) In every county jail where there is a female prisoner, twenty-four-
hour supervision shall be provided by a female correctional officer matron
appointed by the county board, whose duty it shall be to have entire charge of
the female prisoners. The , and the board may also in its discretion appoint a
female correctional officer such matron when there is a sick prisoner or one
that is a minor under the age of sixteen.
(3) Such female correctional officers matrons shall:
(a) Be be under the direction of the sheriff or such other person as may
be charged with the administrative direction of the jail;
(b) Take , shall take the necessary oath before entering upon the duties
of the office;
(c) Be , and shall be paid by the board from the county treasury only for
the time actually engaged; and
(d) When required, report to the board or district judges. Provided, that
in counties having a population in excess of two hundred thousand inhabitants,
a deputy or correctional officer shall be hired by the person whose duty it
shall be to have charge of the female prisoners and perform those functions
required of a deputy related to such duty, at a salary of not less than five
hundred dollars per month, which salary shall be drawn out of the county
treasury. Such matron, deputy, or correctional officer shall, when required,
report to the board or district judges.
Sec. 2. Each county and city jail shall comply with the rules and
regulations of the Jail Standards Board concerning cross-gender supervision and
cross-gender searches of inmates.
Sec. 3. Original section 47-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-